Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF135.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 1221YH (5) 91 je/jh H.F. 135 Section 1. Section 260C.14, Code 2025, is amended by adding 1 the following new subsection: 2 NEW SUBSECTION . 26. a. For purposes of this subsection, 3 âsanitation workerâ means a person employed by a county, city, 4 or township in this state, or a contractor thereof, with a 5 primary job duty to provide collection or transportation of 6 residential or commercial solid waste or recyclables. 7 b. Waive tuition and mandatory fees for a person employed as 8 a sanitation worker for at least one year within the previous 9 five years and for the child of such a person. The board may 10 require that documentation of such employment be provided in 11 order to qualify for such a waiver. 12 Sec. 2. Section 262.9, Code 2025, is amended by adding the 13 following new subsection: 14 NEW SUBSECTION . 39. a. For purposes of this subsection, 15 âsanitation workerâ means a person employed by a county, city, 16 or township in this state, or a contractor thereof, with a 17 primary job duty to provide collection or transportation of 18 residential or commercial solid waste or recyclables. 19 b. Direct the institutions of higher learning governed by 20 the board to waive tuition and mandatory fees for a person 21 employed as a sanitation worker for at least one year within 22 the previous five years and for the child of such a person. 23 The board may require that documentation of such employment be 24 provided in order to qualify for such a waiver. 25 Sec. 3. IMPLEMENTATION OF ACT. Section 25B.2, subsection 26 3, shall not apply to this Act. 27